Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1201.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1301.11(g) and 1301.11a(b), (d) and (e) introductory paragraph of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, are amended to read:Section 1301.11. Report of Property Subject to Custody and Control of the Commonwealth under this Article.-- * * *(g) All agreements or powers of attorney to recover or collect abandoned and unclaimed property contained in the reports filed under this article shall be valid and enforceable only if the agreements:1. are in writing and duly signed and acknowledged by the owner;2. clearly state the fee or compensation to be paid, which shall not exceed [fifteen] ten per centum of the value of the abandoned and unclaimed property;3. disclose the nature and value of the property;4. disclose the name and address of the holder and, if known, whether the abandoned and unclaimed property has been paid or delivered to the State Treasurer;5. identify the name, address and telephone number of the person assisting in the location, delivery or recovery of the abandoned and unclaimed property; and6. identify the valid certificate of registration number assigned to the person assisting in the location, delivery or recovery of the abandoned and unclaimed property under section 20260SB1201PN1475 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233 1301.11a.* * *Section 1301.11a. Certificate of Finder Registration.--* * *(b) An application for a certificate of registration shall be in writing and on the form prescribed by the State Treasurer and accompanied by a recent full face color photograph of the applicant. In addition to information that may be requested by the State Treasurer, the application shall provide the following:1. the applicant's full name, telephone number, e-mail address, home address and work address;2. a statement that the applicant has not, during the ten-year (10) period immediately preceding the submission of the application, violated a provision of this article or been convicted of a felony or an offense of:(i) theft or other related offenses against property as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 (relating to theft and related offenses) or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;(ii) forgery or other fraudulent practices as enumerated in 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 41 (relating to forgery and fraudulent practices) or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction; [or](iii) perjury, false swearing, fraud or other offense as enumerated in 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 49 Subch. A (relating to perjury and falsification in official matters) or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;(iv) burglary and other criminal intrusion as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 35 (relating to burglary and other criminal intrusion) or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;20260SB1201PN1475 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) robbery as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 37 (relating to robbery) or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;(vi) bribery and corrupt influence as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 47 (relating to bribery and corrupt influence) or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction; or(vii) obstructing governmental operations as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 51 (relating to obstructing governmental operations) or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;3. A statement that, to the applicant's knowledge, the applicant is not the subject of an ongoing investigation or prosecution involving an alleged violation of a provision of this article or an offense of:(i) theft or other related offenses against property as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;(ii) forgery or other fraudulent practices as enumerated in 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 41 or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction; [or](iii) perjury, false swearing, fraud or other offense as enumerated in 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 49 Subch. A or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction; [and](iv) burglary and other criminal intrusion as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 35 or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;(v) robbery as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 37 or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;(vi) bribery and corrupt influence as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 47 or its equivalent if committed in another 20260SB1201PN1475 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 jurisdiction; or(vii) obstructing governmental operations as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 51 or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;4. The notarized signature of the applicant immediately following an acknowledgment that a false or perjured statement subjects the applicant to criminal liability[.];5. a completed Federal criminal history background check, of which:(i) the State Treasurer shall prescribe the manner by which the background check shall be submitted, which shall include a method by which applicants may submit fingerprints to be transmitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for Federal criminal history record information pursuant to applicable Federal law;(ii) the background check shall be submitted with the initial or renewal application and shall be no more than five (5) years of age at the time of the application; and(iii) the State Treasurer shall maintain a copy of the background check, which shall be made available to the applicant in a manner prescribed by the State Treasurer;6. the State Treasurer shall reject an application if the applicant refuses or fails to comply with clause 5; and7. a sworn statement of compliance with all applicable ethics standards, on a form and in a manner as prescribed by the State Treasurer.* * *(d) A certificate of registration with a unique registration number may be issued to an applicant if the following conditions are met:20260SB1201PN1475 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1. During the ten-year (10) period immediately preceding the submission of the application, the applicant has not violated a provision of this article or been convicted of a felony or an offense of:(i) theft or other related offenses against property as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;(ii) forgery or other fraudulent practices as enumerated in 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 41 or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction; [or](iii) perjury, false swearing, fraud or other offense as enumerated in 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 49 Subch. A or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction; [and](iv) burglary and other criminal intrusion as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 35 or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;(v) robbery as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 37 or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction;(vi) bribery and corrupt influence as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 47 or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction; or(vii) obstructing governmental operations as enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 51 or its equivalent if committed in another jurisdiction; and2. The applicant has executed a sworn statement that is a commitment to conduct his actions as a finder of abandoned and unclaimed property in compliance with this article and the regulations promulgated under this article.(e) The certificate of registration issued under this section is for a period of [two (2)] five (5) years and may be 20260SB1201PN1475 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renewed every [two (2)] five (5) years if the following conditions are met:* * *Section 2. Section 1301.12(b)3 of the act is amended, subsection (b) is amended by adding a clause and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1301.12. Notice and Publication of Lists of Property Subject to Custody and Control of the Commonwealth under this Article.--* * *(b) The published notice shall be entitled "Notice of Names of Persons Appearing to be Owners of Abandoned and Unclaimed Property," and shall contain:* * *3. A statement that a proof of claim should be presented by the owner to the holder within three (3) months from the date of the published notice, and that thereafter claims should be filed with the State Treasurer[.];4. Information regarding the process by which an owner can claim property through the State Treasurer with no charge.* * *(g) The State Treasurer shall maintain on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Treasury Department a sample finder agreement.Section 3. Section 1301.25(d) of the act is amended to read:Section 1301.25. Penalties.--* * *(d) A person who is found to have violated section 1301.11 or 1301.11a, in addition to other sanctions under this article, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine not to exceed [one thousand dollars ($1,000)] ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for 20260SB1201PN1475 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the first offense. A person who is found guilty of a [subsequent] second offense shall be subject to a fine not to exceed [five thousand dollars ($5,000).] fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). A person who is found guilty of a third or subsequent offense shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree and subject to a fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1201PN1475 - 8 - 12345678